Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4128.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-162, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-162. Nonrecurring adoption expense program; funding; use of other resources; payment A. The department shall establish and administer a program of payment for nonrecurring adoption expenses. Nonrecurring adoption expenses shall be provided from monies appropriated to the department or made available to it from other sources. B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the department shall not reimburse nonrecurring adoption expenses unless an application is approved and an agreement is signed by the department and the applicant for nonrecurring expenses before entry of the final decree of adoption. C. The department may approve and reimburse these expenses after the finalization of an adoption only in the following situations: 1. A final decree of adoption was entered into on or after January 1, 1987 and before the effective date of this article september 27, 1990. 2. A final decree was entered into before January 1, 1987, but nonrecurring adoption expenses were paid after January 1, 1987. D. For adoptions finalized between January 1, 1987 and the effective date of this article september 27, 1990, a person shall file an application by December 14, 1990. END_STATUTE